Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB778.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1156. Pre-K Teacher Salary Supplement Pilot Program.--(a) The Pre-K Teacher Salary Supplement Pilot Program is established within the department to provide a supplement to bring pre-kindergarten teachers' salaries in line with elementary school teachers' salaries for comparable skills.(b) The pilot program shall operate for three school years beginning with the first school year after the effective date of 123456789101112131415161718 this subsection in accordance with the following:(1) No later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of this paragraph, the department shall establish guidelines and procedures for the implementation of this section.(2) The department shall select eligible pre-kindergarten programs using the following criteria:(i) An eligible pre-kindergarten program that is a school district shall have a poverty rate of at least twenty per centum (20%).(ii) An eligible pre-kindergarten program not operated by a school district must be in a census tract with a median poverty level of eighty per centum (80%) or less of the Statewide median.(3) The department shall compare the salary and qualifications of the individual teachers in both the eligible pre-kindergarten program and the teachers for the kindergarten, first grade, second grade, third grade and fourth grade classes at the public school that serves the district in which the pre-kindergarten program is based.(4) The department shall use a formula to calculate what the teachers' salaries would be if they were teaching in the district with the experience and credentials that the teacher currently holds.(5) The department shall provide a subsidy to the eligible pre-kindergarten program to increase the teacher salaries to where the salary would be if the teachers were teaching in the public school district.(6) The department shall collect data and issue a report one year after the implementation of the pilot program in accordance with the following:20250HB0778PN0799 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) The department shall submit a report to the General Assembly detailing the pilot program, the implementation and any success or failure of the pilot program.(ii) The department shall provide recommendations for the General Assembly for improvements and revisions to the pilot program.(7) The department shall apply for Federal, State, private or other non-State funds.(8) The department shall ensure that all funds disbursed are being used solely for increasing teacher salaries. Misused funds must be recovered by the department.(c) An eligible pre-kindergarten program selected for inclusion in the pilot program shall be responsible for the following:(1) Providing all necessary salary and employe information to the department.(2) Providing proof that any funds received are solely going to increasing teacher salaries and not toward lowering the cost of employment for the pre-kindergarten program.(d) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department" shall mean the Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Eligible pre-kindergarten program" shall mean a pre-kindergarten program operated by a school district or by an approved provider under the Pennsylvania Pre-K Counts Program established under section 1512-D."Pilot program" shall mean the Pre-K Teacher Salary Supplement Pilot Program established in subsection (a).20250HB0778PN0799 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0778PN0799 - 4 - 1